Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
SYSTEM STRUCTURE

A. General and Administrative Provisions

[§304A-101] Establishment; available to
all. There shall be a University of Hawaii that shall consist of such
colleges and departments as may from time to time be established. As used in
this chapter, "university" refers to the University of Hawaii, unless
otherwise required by the context.

No person, because of race, color, religion,
sex, national origin, or physical disability, shall be deprived of the
privileges of the university. As used in this section, "physical
disability" means a physical impairment that substantially limits one or
more of a person's major life activities. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Cross References

Authority and organization generally, see Const. Art. X and
§26-11.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next